Louisiana, session 2026, HB1155.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 37:1274.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §1274.2. Nitrous oxide; analgesic
8 A. A physician licensed by the board may use nitrous oxide as an analgesic
9 during minor office surgeries and similar procedures in accordance with guidance
10 and rules as provided by the board.
11 B. The board shall develop guidelines for the safe and effective use of
12 nitrous oxide by physicians and shall not prohibit the use of nitrous oxide in
13 connection with minor office surgeries and similar procedures.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.